Utah statutes.
34A-2-602.   Physical examinations.

(1)  The division or an administrative law judge may require an employee claiming the right to receive compensation under this chapter to submit to a medical examination at any time, and from time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the employee, and as may be provided by the rules of the commission.

(2)  If an employee refuses to submit to an examination under Subsection (1), or obstructs the examination, the employee's right to have the employee's claim for compensation considered, if the employee's claim is pending before an administrative law judge, commissioner, or Appeals Board, or to receive any payments for compensation theretofore granted by a final order of the commission, shall be suspended during the period of the refusal or obstruction.

